District of Columbia statutes.
25-734

Sale by retailer of beverages on credit prohibited.

(a)

A licensee under a retailer’s license shall not sell on credit any alcoholic beverages except as provided in this section.

(b)

For purposes of this section, the extension of credit by the licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license in connection with the sale of an alcoholic beverage through a document, device, or plan intended or adapted for the purpose of establishing credit, except through the use of a credit card, shall be considered a sale on credit.

(c)

This section shall not prohibit a club from extending credit to its members or the guests of members or a hotel from extending credit to its registered guests.

(d)

This section shall not prohibit the licensee under an on-premises retailer’s license from accepting payment by credit card for sales of alcoholic beverages to customers.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 336, ch. 4, § 35
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1394, Pub. L. 91-535, § 6
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 14, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 15, 34 DCR 907
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-734.
1973 Ed., § 25-133.